Washington statutes.
RCW 18.64.163

Uniform Disciplinary Act.

The Uniform Disciplinary Act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of licenses of pharmacists and pharmacy interns, and the discipline of licensed pharmacists and pharmacy interns under this chapter.

[ 1993 c 367 s 14.]